Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1250.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1250.1. As used in the Social Worker's Licensing Act:
1. "Approved provider of continuing education" means an
individual, group, professional association, school, institution,

Req. No. 10374 Page 1

orga nization, or agency approved by the Board to conduct educational
programs;
2. "Approved social work program" means a school of social work
or a social work educational program that has been approved by the
Board;
3. "Assessment" means the gathering of data about emotional,
behavioral, mental, environmental, biopsychosocial, and
interactional processes gathered in an effort to identify the
client's past and current level of functioning. Assessment may also
include the use of standardized psychometric testing instruments
upon successful completion of appropriate, specialized courses or
training;
4. "Board" means the State Board of Licensed Social Workers,
which shall also be known as the State Board of Social Work;
5. "Board-approved clinical supervisor" means a licensed
clinical social worker who has met the qualifications determined by
the Board for supervision in a clinical setting;
6. "Board-approved supervisor" means a licensed clinical social
worker (LCSW) who has met the qualifications determined by the Board
for licensure as a supervisor;
7. "Case management" means a method to plan, provide, evaluate,
and monitor services from a variety of resources on behalf of and in
collaboration with a client;

Req. No. 10374 Page 2

8. "Client" means the individual, couple, family, group,
organization, or community that seeks or receives social work
services;
9. "Clinical social work practice" means the practice of social
work by a social worker including assessment and diagnosis of
behavioral disorders, treatment planning, planning intervention,
case management, information and referrals, including referrals to
an appropriate allopathic or osteopathic physician when the
diagnosis or treatment is in question or psychiatric or medical
treatment is indicated. Treatment methods include the provision of
individual, marital, couple, family and group counseling and
psychotherapy based on the education and training of the social
worker. Treatment shall not include biological or medical
treatments. The practice of clinical social work may include
private or independent practice;
10. "Clinical supervision" means an interactional professional
relationship between a supervisor and a social worker that provides
evaluation and direction over the supervisee's practice of clinical
social work and promotes continued development of the social
worker's knowledge, skills, and abilities to engage in the practice
of clinical social work in an ethical and competent manner;
11. "Consultation" means a problem-solving process in which
expertise is offered to an individual, couple, family, group,
organization or community;
Req. No. 10374 Page 3

12. "Continuing education" means education and training which
are oriented to maintain, improve or enhance the practice of social
work;
13. "Continuing education contact hour" means a sixty-minute
clock hour of instruction, not including breaks or meals;
14. "Conviction" means conviction of a crime by a court of
competent jurisdiction including a finding or verdict of guilt,
whether or not the adjudication of guilt is withheld or not entered
on admission of guilt, a plea of nolo contendere, or a guilty plea;
15. "Counseling" means a method used by social workers to
assist individuals, couples, families and groups in learning how to
solve problems and make decisions about personal, health, social,
educational, vocational, financial, and other interpersonal
concerns;
16. "Diagnosis" means the use of assessment tools such as the
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual or the International
Classification of Diseases;
17. "Employment supervision" means the professional
relationship between a worksite supervisor and social worker in an
employment setting which provides evaluation and direction as it
pertains to job-related duties. This type of supervision shall not
be accepted towards licensure supervision requirements;


Req. No. 10374 Page 4

18. "Examination" means a standardized test or examination of
social work knowledge, skills and abilities which have been approved
by the Board;
19. "Implementation and evaluation" means continuing to
evaluate and monitor the effectiveness of the treatment plan;
20. "Independent social work practice" means the practice of
nonclinical social work by a licensed social worker (LSW), licensed
clinical social worker (LCSW) or licensed social worker with
administration specialty (LSW-ADM) outside of an organized setting,
such as a social, medical, or governmental agency, after completion
of all applicable supervision requirements, in which the social
worker assumes responsibility and accountability for services
provided;
21. "Intervention" means application of techniques utilized to
implement the treatment plan appropriate to an assessment;
22. "Licensed clinical social worker" (LCSW) means a person
duly licensed to practice clinical social work under the Social
Worker's Licensing Act;
23. "Licensed masters social worker" (LMSW) means a person duly
licensed to practice social work under the Social Worker's Licensing
Act and who holds a master's degree in social work;
24. "Licensed social work associate" (LSWA) "Licensed bachelors
social worker (LBSW)" means a person duly licensed to practice
social work under the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
Req. No. 10374 Page 5

25. "Licensed social worker with administration specialty"
(LSW-ADM) means a person duly licensed to practice administrative
social work under the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
26. "Licensed social worker" (LSW) means a person duly licensed
to practice social work under the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
27. "Licensee" means a person duly licensed under the Social
Worker's Licensing Act;
28. "Licensure supervisor" means a licensed social worker who
has met the qualifications determined by the Board for a licensure
supervisor;
29. "Nonclinical social work" means the practice of social work
by a social worker to include but not be limited to case management,
consultation, education, advocacy and community organization, but
excluding counseling in independent practice, psychotherapy,
treatment and diagnosis;
30. "Nonclinical supervision" means the supervision of social
work practice by a social worker to include but not be limited to
case management, consultation, education, advocacy and community
organization;
31. "Practice of social work" means the professional activity
of helping individuals, groups or communities enhance or restore
their capacity for physical, social and economic functioning and the
professional application of social work values, principles and
techniques in areas such as clinical social work, social service
Req. No. 10374 Page 6

admi nistration, social planning, social work consultation and social
work research to one or more of the following ends: Helping people
obtain tangible services; counseling with individuals, families and
groups; helping communities or groups provide or improve social and
health services; and participating in relevant social action. The
practice of social work requires knowledge of human development and
behavior; of social economic and cultural institutions and forces;
and of the interaction of all of these factors. Social work
practice includes the teaching of relevant subject matter and of
conducting research into problems of human behavior and conflict.
Except as otherwise provided in the Social Worker's Licensing Act,
reference to the "practice of social work" shall be the practice of
a person licensed under the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
32. "Private practice of clinical social work" means the
practice of social work performed by a licensed clinical social
worker (LCSW) who is wholly or in part self-employed and who assumes
responsibility for the nature and quality of the services provided
to the client in exchange for direct payment or third-party
reimbursement, rather than a salaried employee of an organization or
institution;
33. "Psychotherapy" means the use of treatment methods
utilizing a specialized, formal interaction between a clinical
social worker and an individual, couple, family, or group in which a
therapeutic relationship is established, maintained and sustained to
Req. No. 10374 Page 7

unde rstand unconscious processes, intrapersonal, interpersonal, and
psychosocial dynamics, and the diagnosis and treatment of mental,
emotional, and behavioral disorders, conditions and addictions;
34. "Supervision" means the professional relationship between
an approved supervisor and a social worker that provides evaluation
and direction over the services provided by the social worker and
promotes continued development of the social worker's knowledge,
skills and abilities to provide social work services in an ethical
and competent manner; and
35. "Treatment planning" or "treatment plan" means the
organized approach of an assessment to guide the course of
behavioral health treatment based upon identified needs, problems
and issues.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1253, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 65, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1253), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1253. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2025 2026, in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma
Sunset Law, the State Board of Licensed Social Workers, consisting
of seven (7) members.
B. Three of the members of the Board shall be licensed social
workers or licensed clinical social workers licensed pursuant to the
provisions of the Social Worker's Licensing Act. Two members shall
be licensed as either social work associates bachelor's social
Req. No. 10374 Page 8

work ers or master's social workers. One member shall be the
president of the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Association of
Social Workers. The remaining member of the Board shall be selected
from and shall represent the general public.
C. Responsibility for enforcement of the provisions of this act
is hereby vested in the State Board of Social Work. The Board shall
have all of the duties, powers and authority specifically granted
by, or necessary for, the enforcement of this act as well as other
duties, powers and authority it may be granted by applicable law.
D. 1. Each member of the Board appointed as a social worker
shall:
a. be a resident of this state,
b. be licensed in good standing to engage in the practice
of social work in this state,
c. at the time of appointment, have been actively engaged
in the practice of social work for at least one (1)
year out of the last five (5) years, and
d. have at least three (3) years of experience in the
practice of social work.
2. Each member of the Board appointed to represent the general
public shall be a resident of this state who has attained the age of
majority and shall not be, nor shall ever have been, a social work
licensee, or the spouse of a social work licensee, or a person who
has ever had any material financial interest in the provision of
Req. No. 10374 Page 9

soci al work services or has engaged in any activity directly related
to the practice of social work.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1261.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 109, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1261.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1261.1. A. To obtain a license under the Social
Worker's Licensing Act, an applicant shall:
1. Submit a written application in a form prescribed by the
State Board of Licensed Social Workers;
2. Have attained the age of majority;
3. Have graduated and received a degree in social work from an
approved social work program;
4. Have completed any necessary post graduate experience and
supervision in the practice of social work;
5. Have passed the necessary examination and paid all fees
required by the Board; and
6. Submit to a national criminal history record check, as
defined by Section 150.9 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The
costs associated with the national criminal history record check
shall be paid by the applicant and submitted to the Board at the
time of application. With the required fee, the applicant shall
provide to the Board two classifiable sets of fingerprints to be
provided to the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation.

Req. No. 10374 Page 10

B. If the results of the national criminal history record check
required by subsection A of this section reveal that the applicant
has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to, any
felony crime that substantially relates to the occupation of a
social worker and poses a reasonable threat to public safety, the
individual's application for licensure may be disapproved and no
further action shall be taken on the application.
C. Upon certification by the Board, the Board shall authorize
the issuance of social work licenses to persons who qualify as
follows:
1. As a licensed social work associate (LSWA) bachelor's social
worker (LBSW) who has a baccalaureate degree in social work from an
accredited institution or an approved social work program or both
and has passed the examination provided for under these provisions
or who has a doctoral or master's degree in social work from an
institution with a program accredited by an approved social work
program and has passed the examination provided for under these
provisions;
2. As a licensed master's social worker (LMSW) who has a
master's degree in social work from an accredited institution or an
approved social work program or both and has passed the examination
provided for under the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
3. As a licensed social worker (LSW) who has a master's degree
in social work from an accredited institution or an approved social
Req. No. 10374 Page 11

work program or both and has three thousand (3,000) hours of
postgraduate experience in the practice of social work under
professional supervision of a person licensed under those
provisions, and who has passed the examination provided for under
the provisions of the Social Worker's Licensing Act;
4. As a licensed clinical social worker (LCSW) who has a
master's degree in social work from an accredited institution or an
approved social work program or both and has three thousand (3,000)
hours of postgraduate experience in the practice of clinical social
work under professional supervision of a person licensed by the
Social Worker's Licensing Act, and who has passed the examination
provided for under the Social Worker's Licensing Act; and
5. As a licensed social worker with administration specialty
(LSW-ADM) who has a master's degree in social work from an
accredited institution or an approved social work program or both
and has three thousand (3,000) hours of postgraduate experience in
the practice of administrative social work under professional
supervision of a person licensed by the Social Worker's Licensing
Act, and who has passed the examination provided for under the
Social Worker's Licensing Act.
D. Applicants who have been licensed as an LSWA LBSW, LMSW,
LSW, LCSW or LSW-ADM in good standing in another state for a minimum
of three (3) years continually since the time of initial full

Req. No. 10374 Page 12

lice nsure post-provisional term and comply with all other state
requirements shall be licensed by the Board.
E. No person may engage in the private practice of clinical
social work unless that person:
1. Is licensed under the Social Worker's Licensing Act as a
licensed clinical social worker (LCSW); and
2. Continues to meet continuing education requirements set by
the Board.
F. No person may engage in an independent social work practice
unless that person:
1. Is licensed under the Social Worker's Licensing Act as a
licensed clinical social worker (LCSW), licensed social worker with
administration specialty (LSW-ADM) or licensed social worker (LSW).
This specifically and intentionally excludes licensed social work
associates (LSWA) bachelor's social workers (LBSW) and licensed
masters social workers (LMSW); and
2. Continues to meet continuing education requirements set by
the Board.
G. Any person seeking to pursue postgraduate supervision for
the licensed social worker (LSW), licensed social worker with
administration specialty (LSW-ADM), or licensed clinical social
worker (LCSW) must hold licensure status of licensed social work
associate (LSWA) bachelor's social worker (LBSW) or licensed masters
social worker (LMSW) prior to board approval of postgraduate
Req. No. 10374 Page 13

supe rvision for licensure as specified in paragraphs 3, 4 and 5 of
subsection C of this section.
H. As used in this section:
1. "Substantially relates" means the nature of criminal conduct
for which the person was convicted has a direct bearing on the
fitness or ability to perform one or more of the duties or
responsibilities necessarily related to the occupation; and
2. "Poses a reasonable threat" means the nature of criminal
conduct for which the person was convicted involved an act or threat
of harm against another and has a bearing on the fitness or ability
to serve the public or work with others in the occupation.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1265, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1265. Any person who has received a license as a
licensed social work associate bachelor's social worker shall have
the right to use the title Licensed Social Work Associate Bachelor's
Social Worker, and the abbreviation, LSWA LBSW. No other person
shall assume such title, use such abbreviation, or any word or
letters, signs, figures or devices to indicate that the person using
the same is a licensed social work associate bachelor's social
worker.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1270, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1270. A. It shall be a misdemeanor for any person to:
Req. No. 10374 Page 14

1. Use in connection with his or her name any designation
tending to imply that he or she is licensed under the Social
Worker's Licensing Act unless he or she is duly and respectively
licensed under the provisions of this act;
2. Use in connection with his or her name any designation
tending to imply that he or she is licensed under the provisions of
this act during the time his or her license shall be suspended or
revoked; or
3. Otherwise violate any of the provisions of this act.
B. 1. Except as otherwise provided, it shall be unlawful for
any individual to engage in the practice of social work unless duly
licensed under this act.
2. Except as otherwise provided, it shall be unlawful for any
individual to engage in the practice of Clinical Social Work unless
duly licensed as a Clinical Social Worker under this act.
3. No individual shall offer social work services or use the
designation social worker, licensed social work associate bachelor's
social worker, licensed master's social worker, licensed social
worker, licensed clinical social worker or the initials LSWA LBSW,
LMSW, LSW, or LCSW or any other designation indicating licensure
status or hold themselves out as licensed to practice social work
unless duly licensed.
4. The provision of social work services to an individual in
this state, through telephonic, electronic or other means,
Req. No. 10374 Page 15

rega rdless of the location of the social worker, shall constitute
the practice of social work and shall be subject to regulation.
5. Any individual who, after hearing, is found by the State
Board of Licensed Social Workers to have unlawfully engaged in the
practice of social work or to have violated other provisions of this
act shall be subject to a fine to be imposed by the Board not to
exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for each offense. Each
violation of this act or Board rules pertaining to unlawful practice
of social work shall also constitute a misdemeanor.
6. Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent members of
other professions from performing functions for which they are duly
licensed; provided, however, such professionals shall not hold
themselves out or refer to themselves by any title or description
stating or implying that they are engaged in the practice of social
work or that they are licensed to engage in the practice of social
work.
7. Students currently participating in an approved social work
program are exempt from licensure under this act when enrolled in or
participating in an internship, externship, or other social work
experience requirements for such programs.
SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10374 TKR 12/18/24

Req. No. 10374 Page 16